Hawaii statutes.
§157-29 Milk control special fund.
There is established the milk control special fund to be administered by the
board of agriculture. All moneys received by the board of agriculture as
application fees and for licenses or otherwise under this chapter, and any
state appropriations or other moneys made available to carry out the purposes
of this chapter, shall be deposited into the special fund. All interest earned
or accrued on moneys deposited in the special fund shall become part of the
special fund. Moneys in the special fund shall be expended to cover all costs
of administering this chapter including but not limited to the costs of
salaries, fringe benefits, operating expenses, equipment, motor vehicles,
contracts for services, and promotional expenses. Moneys in the special fund
may be transferred to the general fund for salaries and fringe benefits of
other state employees assisting in administering this chapter and other related
costs. A reserve in an amount of not less than $300,000 shall be maintained in
the special fund to cover contingency costs including but not limited to
accrued vacation leave, audits, unemployment insurance, and workers'
compensation. [L 1998, c 211, §1; am L 2014, c 176, §2]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next